Hawaii statutes.
§554G-7 Retained interests of transferor.
(a) A permitted transfer shall be subject to this chapter notwithstanding a
transferor's retention of any or all of the powers and rights described in
section 554G-5(c) and notwithstanding the transferor's service as investment
advisor pursuant to section 554G-4.5(a)(3).

(b) The transferor shall have only the powers
and rights specifically conferred by the trust instrument. Except as permitted
by sections 554G-5(c) and 554G-4.5(a)(3), a transferor shall have no rights or
authority with respect to the property that is the subject of a permitted
transfer or to the income from property that is the subject of a permitted
transfer. Any agreement or understanding purporting to grant or permit the
retention of any greater rights or authority shall be void. [L 2010, c 182, pt
of §2; am L 2011, c 161, §7]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next